Rhode Island statutes. Title 32 Parks and Recreational Areas
Chapter 4 Green Acres Land Acquisition

32-4-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Green Acres Land Acquisition Act of 1964”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-1

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-2.
Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Providing land for public recreation and the conservation of natural resources promotes the public health, prosperity, and general welfare and is a proper responsibility of government;

The lands now provided for those purposes will not be adequate to meet the needs of the expanding population in years to come;

The expansion of population, while increasing the need for those lands, will continually diminish the supply thereof and will tend to increase the cost to the public of acquiring lands suitable and appropriate for those purposes; and

The state should act now to acquire and to assist local governments to acquire substantial quantities of those lands now available so that they may be used and preserved for future use for those purposes.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-2

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Director” means the director of administration or his or her designated representative;

“Land” or “lands” means and includes real property, and improvements thereon, rights of way, water, riparian and other rights and easements, conservation easements, scenic easements, privileges, present and future estates, and interests of every kind and description in real property;

“Local unit” means a city or town or any agency thereof; and

“Recreation and conservation purposes” means and includes use of lands for agriculture, parks, natural areas, forests, camping, fishing, wetlands and marsh lands preservation, wildlife habitat, hunting, golfing, boating, winter sports, scenic preservation, and similar uses for public outdoor recreation and conservation of natural resources.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-3

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-4.
Application of funds.

The director shall use the sum appropriated by this chapter, and such other sums as may be appropriated or as may otherwise be available from time to time, for the purposes herein set forth, to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes and to make grants to assist local units to acquire lands for those purposes, subject to the conditions and limitations prescribed by this chapter.

The director is authorized for and on behalf of the state, with the approval of the governor, to apply for, and accept from, the federal government or any department or agency thereof assistance that may become available for the purposes of this chapter, whether it be in the form of a loan or grant or otherwise; to accept the provisions of any federal legislation or regulations therefor; to enter into contracts in connection therewith; and to act as agent for the federal government in connection therewith or to designate a subordinate so to act. To obtain federal assistance, the director is authorized to comply with any federal law, or rules and regulations thereunder, and to meet such federal requirements as may be made conditions precedent to receiving federal assistance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-4

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 54.

32-4-5.
Duties of director.

In acquiring lands and making grants to assist local units to acquire lands, the director shall:

Seek to achieve a reasonable balance among all areas of the state in consideration of the relative adequacy of area recreation and conservation facilities at the time and the relative anticipated future needs for additional recreation and conservation facilities;

Give due consideration to the special park requirement needs of urban areas;

Give due consideration to acquiring unusual or unique natural areas;

Insofar as practicable, and except as provided in subdivision (3) of this section, limit acquisition to predominately open and natural land in order to minimize the cost of acquisition and the expense of rendering land suitable for recreation and conservation purposes;

Wherever possible, select land for acquisition that is suitable for multiple recreation and conservation purposes and contains an area sufficiently large to make practical its use for those purposes;

Give due consideration to coordination with the plans of other departments of state government with respect to land use or acquisition. For this purpose, the director is authorized to use the facilities of the department of economic development and any agency, commission, or interdepartmental committee; and

Encourage contiguous local units to develop joint plans with respect to land use or acquisition for recreation and conservation purposes.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-5

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 54.

32-4-6.
Acquisition of lands.

Lands acquired under this chapter by the state shall be acquired by the director with the approval of the governor by purchase, gift, devise, or otherwise on such terms and conditions as the director shall determine, or by the exercise of eminent domain, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37, insofar as those provisions are consistent with the provisions of this chapter. This power of acquisition shall extend to lands held by any local unit.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-6

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-7.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the administration, operation, and use of lands acquired by the state under this chapter to effect the purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-7

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-8.
Acquisition of lands by local units.

Local units are hereby authorized and empowered to acquire lands for the conservation and recreation purposes of this chapter. If the director approves the acquisition of lands by a local unit with state assistance, the lands may be acquired in the name of the local unit in any manner the local unit is authorized by law to acquire real property; provided, however, that if the acquisition is by eminent domain, it shall conform with the provisions of chapter 1 of title 24, insofar as they are consistent with the provisions of this chapter. In acquiring land for the conservation and recreation purposes of this chapter, the local unit may deal directly with the federal government or any department or agency thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-8

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-9.
State grants — Application.

A state grant to assist a local unit to acquire lands for recreation and conservation purposes shall not be made under this chapter until:

The local unit has applied to the director on forms prescribed by the director:

Describing the lands for the acquisition of which the grant is sought;

Stating the recreation and/or conservation purpose or purposes to which the lands will be devoted, and the facts that give rise to the need for the lands for that purpose;

Setting forth a comprehensive plan for the development of the lands approved by the governing body of the local unit; and

Stating such other matters as the director shall prescribe;

The director shall have prescribed the terms and conditions under which the grant applied for will be made; and

The local unit shall have filed with the director its acceptance of the terms and conditions and has otherwise complied with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-9

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 54.

32-4-10.
Regulation of lands.

A state grant shall not be made under this chapter until the local unit has adopted regulations governing the administration, use, and development of the lands in question and until the director shall have approved them. No regulation may be altered thereafter without the approval of the director.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-10

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-11.
Percentage of state grants.

Grants under this chapter shall be made by the director. In the case of a single, local unit, the grant shall be in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the nonfederal share of the cost of the lands, and in the case of two (2) or more contiguous local units that shall join together to present a joint comprehensive plan for the development of those units approved by their respective governing bodies, the grant shall be in an amount equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the nonfederal share of the cost of the lands.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-11

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 54.

32-4-12.
Diversion from use.

Lands acquired by one or more local units with the aid of a state grant under this chapter shall not be disposed of or diverted to a use for other than recreation and conservation purposes without the approval of the director. That approval shall not be given unless the local unit or units shall agree to repay to the state the amount of the state grant given to the local unit or units under the provisions of §

32-4-11

.

Lands acquired by the state under this chapter shall not be disposed of or diverted to use for other than recreation and conservation purposes without the approval of the governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-12

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-13.
Acquisition of lands by private sale.

Any other provision of law notwithstanding, the state may acquire lands under this chapter from any local unit at private sale.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-13

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-14.
Authority of director.

The director is authorized to do all things necessary, useful, or convenient to carry out his or her duties under this chapter, including, but not limited to:

Obtaining engineering, inspection, legal, financial, geological, hydrological, and other professional services, estimates, and advice;

Entering on any lands for the purpose of making surveys, borings, soundings, or other inspections or examinations;

Prescribing rules and regulations to implement any provisions of this chapter; and

Entering into arrangements with the federal government as provided for in this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-14

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.

32-4-15.
Allocation of appropriations — Acquisition and development fund.

Unless otherwise provided, money appropriated for use in executing the provisions of this chapter shall be allocated as follows:

With respect to acquisition of lands by the state hereunder, two-thirds (2/3) thereof; and

With respect to state grants under this chapter to assist local units to acquire lands, one-third (1/3) thereof.

Such sums as may be from time to time appropriated or otherwise made available by the issue of bonds for the acquisitions contemplated by this chapter shall be held in a separate fund, and be deposited in such depositories as may be selected by the general treasurer to the credit of the fund, which shall be known as the recreation and conservation land acquisition and development fund of 1964. The moneys in the said recreation and conservation land acquisition and development fund are hereby specifically dedicated to meeting the cost of public acquisition and development of land for recreation and conservation purposes and shall not be expended except in accordance with law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

32-4-15

; P.L. 1964, ch. 174, § 1.